Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB477.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 910.1. Background Checks for Candidates for School District Office.--(a) At the time of filing a candidate's nomination petition and a candidate's affidavit, each candidate for any school district office shall file the following with the Department of State:12345678910111213141516171819202122 (1) Pursuant to 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 91 (relating to criminal history record information), a report of criminal history record information from the Pennsylvania State Police or a statement from the Pennsylvania State Police that the State Police central repository contains no criminal history information relating to that candidate. The criminal history record information shall be limited to that which is disseminated under 18 Pa.C.S. § 9121(b)(2) (relating to general regulations).(2) A certification from the Department of Human Services as to whether the candidate is named in the Statewide database as the alleged perpetrator in a pending child abuse investigation or as the perpetrator of a founded report or an indicated report.(3) A report of Federal criminal history record information. The candidate shall submit a full set of fingerprints to the Pennsylvania State Police for the purpose of a record check, and the Pennsylvania State Police or its authorized agent shall submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of verifying the identity of the candidate and obtaining a current record of any criminal arrests and convictions.(b) A candidate for any school district office shall be deemed ineligible for office if:(1) The Department of Human Services verifies that the candidate is named in the Statewide database as the perpetrator of a founded report committed within the five-year period immediately preceding verification pursuant to this section.(2) The candidate's criminal history record information indicates that the candidate has been convicted of any of the following offenses or an equivalent crime under Federal law or 20250HB0477PN0460 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the law of another state:(i) 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 25 (relating to criminal homicide).(ii) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702 (relating to aggravated assault).(iii) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2709.1 (relating to stalking).(iv) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2718 (relating to strangulation).(v) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2901 (relating to kidnapping).(vi) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2902 (relating to unlawful restraint).(vii) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3121 (relating to rape).(viii) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3122.1 (relating to statutory sexual assault).(ix) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3123 (relating to involuntary deviate sexual intercourse).(x) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3124.1 (relating to sexual assault).(xi) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3125 (relating to aggravated indecent assault).(xii) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3126 (relating to indecent assault).(xiii) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3127 (relating to indecent exposure).(xiv) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3301 (relating to arson and related offenses).(xv) 18 Pa.C.S. § 4302 (relating to incest).(xvi) 18 Pa.C.S. § 4303 (relating to concealing death of child).(xvii) 18 Pa.C.S. § 4304 (relating to endangering welfare of children).(xviii) 18 Pa.C.S. § 4305 (relating to dealing in infant children).(xix) A felony offense under 18 Pa.C.S. § 5902(b) (relating to prostitution and related offenses).(xx) 18 Pa.C.S. § 5903(c) or (d) (relating to obscene and other sexual materials and performances).20250HB0477PN0460 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xxi) 18 Pa.C.S. § 6301 (relating to corruption of minors).(xxii) 18 Pa.C.S. § 6312 (relating to sexual abuse of children).(xxiii) The attempt, solicitation or conspiracy to commit an offense under this paragraph.(3) The candidate's criminal history record information indicates that the candidate has been convicted of a felony offense under the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as "The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act," committed within the five-year period immediately preceding verification under this section.(4) The candidate's criminal history record information indicates that the candidate has been convicted of an offense under 18 U.S.C. § 2261 (relating to interstate domestic violence) or 2262 (relating to interstate violation of protection order).(5) The candidate's name appears on the National Crime Information Center National Sex Offender Registry or on a state's sex offender registry.(6) The candidate's name appears on a Statewide database or its equivalent as a perpetrator of child abuse.(c) A candidate for any school district office deemed ineligible for office under this section shall not appear on a ballot for school district office in any election.(d) The Department of State shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out this section.Section 2. The addition of section 910.1 of the act shall apply to elections held 180 days after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0477PN0460 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930